Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1103
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the Developmental Disabilities Court-Ordered Custody Act is to provide a procedure for court-ordered custody and treatment for a person with developmental disabilities when he or she poses a threat of harm to others.

Laws 2005, LB 206, § 3.